Vermont, session 2025-2026, S143.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 16 V.S.A. § 570 is amended to read:
§ 570. HARASSMENT, HAZING, AND BULLYING PREVENTION
POLICIES
* * *
(d) Duties of the Secretary. The Secretary shall:
(1) develop and, from time to time, update model harassment, hazing,
and bullying prevention policies; and
VT LEG #382178 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.143
2025 Page 2 of 6
(2) establish an Advisory Council to review and coordinate school and
statewide activities relating to the prevention of and response to harassment,
hazing, and bullying. The Council shall report annually in January to the State
Board and the House and Senate Committees on Education. The Council shall
include:
(A) the Executive Director of the Vermont Principals’ Association or
designee;
(B) the Executive Director of the Vermont School Boards
Association or designee;
(C) the Executive Director of the Vermont Superintendents
Association or designee;
(D) the President of the Vermont-National Education Association or
designee;
(E) the Executive Director of the Vermont Human Rights
Commission or designee;
(F) the Executive Director of the Vermont Independent Schools
Association or designee; and
(G) other members selected by the Secretary, at least one of whom
shall be a current secondary student who has witnessed or experienced
harassment, hazing, or bullying in the school environment; and
VT LEG #382178 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.143
2025 Page 3 of 6
(3) provide the Advisory Council with administrative support.
(e) Advisory Council on Harassment, Hazing, and Bullying Prevention in
Schools.
(1) Membership. The Advisory Council shall be composed of the
following members:
(A) the Secretary of Education or designee;
(B) a principal, appointed by the Vermont Principals’ Association;
(C) a school board member, appointed by the Vermont School
Boards Association;
(D) a superintendent, appointed by the Vermont Superintendents
Association;
(E) a teacher, appointed by the Vermont-National Education
Association;
(F) the Executive Director of the Vermont Human Rights
Commission or designee;
(G) the Executive Director of the Vermont Independent Schools
Association or designee;
(H) a member, appointed by the Vermont Coalition for Disability
Rights;
(I) a student member, appointed by the Education Justice Coalition of
Vermont;
VT LEG #382178 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.143
2025 Page 4 of 6
(J) a student member, appointed by the Vermont Student Anti-
Racism Network;
(K) a member, appointed by Outright Vermont;
(L) a member, appointed by the Office of Racial Equity;
(M) a member, appointed by the Vermont Network Against Domestic
and Sexual Violence;
(N) a member, appointed by the National Association of Social
Workers-Vermont (NASW-VT); and
(O) a parent member, appointed by the Vermont Family Network.
(2) Duties. The Advisory Council shall:
(A) Meet at least four and not more than six times per year.
(B) Review and coordinate school and statewide activities relating to
the prevention of and response to harassment, hazing, and bullying.
(C) Review the model harassment, hazing, and bullying prevention
policies developed by the Secretary every two years, beginning in 2025, and
recommend updates to the policies as necessary.
(D) Generate and distribute resources on hazing, harassment, and
bullying prevention and response to school professionals, including:
(i) best practices for reentry into and maintaining access to
educational spaces;
VT LEG #382178 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.143
2025 Page 5 of 6
(ii) restorative practice framework for responding to hazing,
harassment, and bullying issues;
(iii) differentiated responses for complainants and accused
students with disabilities; and
(iv) annually soliciting input from students, parents, and schools
on hazing, harassment, and bullying.
(E) Notwithstanding 2 V.S.A. § 20(d), annually on or before January
15, the Council shall submit a written report to House and Senate Committees
on Education, which shall hold a joint legislative hearing each legislative
session to review the report. The Council shall also submit the report to the
State Board of Education at the same time. The report shall contain:
(i) details on the past year’s Advisory Council activities and the
upcoming year’s priorities;
(ii) a summary of solicited input from students, parents, and
schools on hazing, harassment, and bullying;
(iii) a list of resources the Agency needs to support work related to
hazing, harassment, and bullying; and
(iv) any recommendations for legislative changes.
(3) Compensation and reimbursement. Members of the Council shall be
entitled to per diem compensation and reimbursement of expenses as permitted
under 32 V.S.A. § 1010 for not more than six meetings of the Council per year.
VT LEG #382178 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.143
2025 Page 6 of 6
(f) Definitions. In this subchapter:
(1) “Educational institution” and “school” mean a public school or an
approved or recognized independent school as defined in section 11 of this
title.
(2) “Organization,” “pledging,” and “student” have the same meanings
as in section 570i of this title.
(3) “Harassment,” “hazing,” and “bullying” have the same meanings as
in subdivisions 11(a)(26), (30), and (32) of this title.
(4) “School board” means the board of directors or other governing
body of an educational institution when referring to an independent school.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #382178 v.2